Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [82B.26] DISCIPLINARY SANCTION MATRIX. new text end new text begin When establishing a sanction for an appraiser, the commissioner may consider the current version of the Voluntary Disciplinary Action Matrix published by the Appraisal Foundation as nonbinding guidance. The commissioner retains discretion to determine the appropriate sanction based on the specific facts of each case, regardless of the suggestions contained within the matrix. new text end